South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-3670 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-6-3670. (A) An individual taxpayer may claim a credit against the income tax imposed pursuant to Section 12-6-510 for excess premium paid during the applicable tax year for property and casualty insurance, as defined in Articles 1, 3, and 5 of Chapter 75, Title 38, providing coverage on the taxpayer's legal residence pursuant to Section 12-43-220(c). (B) For the purposes of computing the credit allowed by this section, excess premium paid is the amount by which the premium paid exceeds five percent of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income. (C)(1) The credit allowed pursuant to this section for any taxable year may not exceed one thousand two hundred fifty dollarstwo thousand dollars. (2) If the credit allowed under this section exceeds the state income tax liability for the taxable year, any unused credit may be carried forward for five succeeding taxable years. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. ----XX----